Florida, session 2026, HB609.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
21
22 Section 1. Present paragraphs (g) through (j) of
23 subsection (1), paragraphs (g) and (h) of subsection (13), and
24 subsection (14) of section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, are
25 redesignated as paragraphs (h) through (k) of subsection (1),
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb609-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 609 2026
26 paragraphs (j) and (k) of subsection (13), and subsection (15),
27 respectively, a new paragraph (g) is added to subsection (1) of
28 that section, new paragraphs (g) and (h) and paragraph (i) are
29 added to subsection (13) of that section, a new subsection (14)
30 is added to that section, and paragraphs (a), (d), (e), and (f)
31 of subsection (1) and paragraphs (b) and (f) of subsection (13)
32 of that section are amended, to read:
33 849.0931 Bingo authorized; conditions for conduct;
34 permitted uses of proceeds; limitations.—
35 (1) As used in this section:
36 (a) "Bingo game" means and refers to the activity,
37 commonly known as "bingo," in which participants pay a sum of
38 money for the use of one or more bingo cards. When the game
39 commences, numbers are drawn by chance, one by one, and
40 announced. The players cover or mark those numbers on the bingo
41 cards which they have purchased until a player receives a given
42 order of numbers in sequence that has been preannounced for that
43 particular game. This player calls out "bingo" and is declared
44 the winner of a predetermined prize. More than one game may be
45 played upon a bingo card, and numbers called for one game may be
46 used for a succeeding game or games.
47 (d) "Deal" means a separate set or package of not more
48 than 4,000 instant bingo tickets in which the predetermined
49 minimum prize payout is at least 65 percent of the total
50 receipts from the sale of the entire deal.
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb609-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 609 2026
51 (e) "Flare" means the board, or placard, or digital
52 display that accompanies each deal of instant bingo tickets and
53 that displays has printed on or affixed to it the following
54 information:
55 1. The game name.
56 2. The manufacturer's name or distinctive logo.
57 3. The form number.
58 4. The ticket count.
59 5. The prize structure, including the number of symbols or
60 number combinations for winning instant bingo tickets by
61 denomination, with their respective winning symbols or number
62 combinations.
63 6. The cost per play.
64 7. The game serial number.
65 (f) "Instant bingo" means a form of bingo that is played
66 at the same location as bingo, using tickets that are sold by
67 the bingo operator or through an instant bingo ticket dispenser
68 by which a player wins a prize by opening and removing a cover
69 from the ticket to reveal a set of numbers, letters, objects, or
70 patterns, some of which have been designated in advance as prize
71 winners.
72 (g) "Instant bingo ticket dispenser" means a device that
73 dispenses an instant bingo ticket or reads a barcode printed on
74 the exterior of the instant bingo ticket as the ticket is
75 dispensed and displays the win or loss status of the instant
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb609-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 609 2026
76 bingo ticket on a video display contained on the device.
77 (13)
78 (b) Each deal of instant bingo tickets must be accompanied
79 by a flare, and the flare must be visible to the player posted
80 before the sale of any tickets in that deal.
81 (f) Except as provided under paragraph (e), an instant
82 bingo ticket manufactured, sold, or distributed in this state
83 must:
84 1. Be manufactured so that it is not possible to identify
85 whether it is a winning or losing instant bingo ticket until it
86 has been opened by the player as intended or the results are
87 displayed on an instant bingo dispenser that reveals the win or
88 loss status of the ticket as it is dispensed.
89 2. Be manufactured using at least a two-ply paper stock
90 construction so that the instant bingo ticket is opaque.
91 3. Have the form number, the deal's serial number, and the
92 name or logo of the manufacturer conspicuously printed on the
93 face or cover of the instant bingo ticket.
94 4. Have a form of winner protection that allows the
95 organization to verify, after the instant bingo ticket has been
96 played, that the winning instant bingo ticket presented for
97 payment is an authentic winning instant bingo ticket for the
98 deal in play. The manufacturer shall provide a written
99 description of the winner protection with each deal of instant
100 bingo tickets.
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb609-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 609 2026
101 (g) An instant bingo ticket dispenser must have the
102 following features:
103 1. A bill acceptor that accepts only United States
104 currency and accounts for all currency inserted into the
105 dispenser.
106 2. The ability to track the sale of all instant bingo
107 tickets dispensed.
108 (h) An instant bingo ticket dispenser that reads a bar
109 code and displays the ticket outcome on a video display on the
110 device must have the additional capability of:
111 1. Producing a voucher for prize verification and
112 redemption or proof of purchase; and
113 2. Producing reports showing gross sales, prizes paid, and
114 net receipts to the charitable, nonprofit, or veterans'
115 organization.
116 (i) An instant bingo ticket dispenser may not:
117 1. Display the outcome of an instant bingo ticket using
118 spinning reels or other features that mimic a slot machine or
119 any common casino table game;
120 2. Contain a random number generator or any software that
121 influences the outcome of the instant bingo game; or
122 3. Contain any feature that simulates skill or allows
123 player input to influence the outcome of the predetermined
124 instant bingo game result.
125 (14) This section may not be construed to authorize a
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb609-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 609 2026
126 charitable, nonprofit, or veterans' organization to engage in
127 class III gaming as that term is defined in 25 U.S.C. s. 2703
128 (8).
129 Section 2. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
130 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a
131 reference thereto, paragraph (e) of subsection (4) of section
132 402.82, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
133 402.82 Electronic benefits transfer program.—
134 (4) Use or acceptance of an electronic benefits transfer
135 card is prohibited at the following locations or for the
136 following activities:
137 (e) A commercial bingo facility that operates outside the
138 provisions of s. 849.0931.
139 Section 3. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
140 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a
141 reference thereto, section 718.114, Florida Statutes, is
142 reenacted to read:
143 718.114 Association powers.—An association may enter into
144 agreements to acquire leaseholds, memberships, and other
145 possessory or use interests in lands or facilities such as
146 country clubs, golf courses, marinas, and other recreational
147 facilities, regardless of whether the lands or facilities are
148 contiguous to the lands of the condominium, if such lands and
149 facilities are intended to provide enjoyment, recreation, or
150 other use or benefit to the unit owners. All of these
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb609-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 609 2026
151 leaseholds, memberships, and other possessory or use interests
152 existing or created at the time of recording the declaration
153 must be stated and fully described in the declaration.
154 Subsequent to the recording of the declaration, agreements
155 acquiring these leaseholds, memberships, or other possessory or
156 use interests which are not entered into within 12 months of the
157 date of the recording of the certificate of a surveyor and
158 mapper pursuant to s. 718.104(4)(e) or the recording of an
159 instrument that transfers title to a unit in the condominium
160 which is not accompanied by a recorded assignment of developer
161 rights in favor of the grantee of such unit, whichever occurs
162 first, are a material alteration or substantial addition to the
163 real property that is association property, and the association
164 may not acquire or enter into such agreements except upon a vote
165 of, or written consent by, a majority of the total voting
166 interests or as authorized by the declaration as provided in s.
167 718.113. The declaration may provide that the rental, membership
168 fees, operations, replacements, and other expenses are common
169 expenses and may impose covenants and restrictions concerning
170 their use and may contain other provisions not inconsistent with
171 this chapter. A condominium association may conduct bingo games
172 as provided in s. 849.0931.
173 Section 4. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
174 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a
175 reference thereto, subsection (10) of section 723.079, Florida
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb609-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 609 2026
176 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
177 723.079 Powers and duties of homeowners' association.—
178 (10) Any mobile home owners' association or group of
179 residents of a mobile home park as defined in this chapter may
180 conduct bingo games as provided in s. 849.0931.
181 Section 5. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
182 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a
183 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 849.09, Florida
184 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
185 849.09 Lottery prohibited; exceptions.—
186 (3) Any person who is convicted of violating any of the
187 provisions of paragraph (e), paragraph (f), paragraph (g),
188 paragraph (i), or paragraph (k) of subsection (1) is guilty of a
189 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
190 775.082 or s. 775.083. Any person who, having been convicted of
191 violating any provision thereof, thereafter violates any
192 provision thereof is guilty of a felony of the third degree,
193 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
194 The provisions of this section do not apply to bingo as provided
195 for in s. 849.0931.
196 Section 6. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
197 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a
198 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
199 849.094, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
200 849.094 Game promotion in connection with sale of consumer
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb609-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 609 2026
201 products or services.—
202 (1) As used in this section, the term:
203 (a) "Game promotion" means, but is not limited to, a
204 contest, game of chance, sweepstakes, or gift enterprise,
205 conducted by an operator within or throughout the state and
206 other states in connection with and incidental to the sale of
207 consumer products or services, and in which the elements of
208 chance and prize are present. However, "game promotion" may not
209 be construed to apply to bingo games conducted pursuant to s.
210 849.0931.
211 Section 7. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
212 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a
213 reference thereto, subsection (6) of section 849.142, Florida
214 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
215 849.142 Exempted activities.—Sections 849.01, 849.08,
216 849.09, 849.11, 849.14, and 849.25 do not apply to participation
217 in or the conduct of any of the following activities:
218 (6) Bingo games conducted pursuant to s. 849.0931.
219 Section 8. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb609-00